Utah statutes.
26-35a-102.   Legislative findings.

(1)  The Legislature finds that there is an important state purpose to improve the quality of care given to the elderly and the physically disabled, in long-term care nursing facilities.

(2)  The Legislature finds that in order to improve the quality of care to those persons described in Subsection (1), the rates paid to the nursing care facilities by the Medicaid program must be adequate to encourage and support quality care.

(3)  The Legislature finds that in order to meet the objectives in Subsections (1) and (2), adequate funding must be provided to increase the rates paid to nursing care facilities providing services pursuant to the Medicaid program.

